Missouri, session 2026, SB1705.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1180, to read as
follows:
376.1180. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirement", the same meaning as in
section 376.1183;
(2) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as in
section 376.1350;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning as in section
376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that
offers or issues health benefit plans that are delivered,
issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on
or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage, and shall
not impose any cost-sharing requirement for:
(1) Evidence-based items or services that have in
effect a rating of A or B in the recommendations of the U.S.
Preventative Services Task Force with respect to the
individual involved;

SB 1705 2
(2) Immunizations that have in effect a recommendation
from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with respect to
the individual involved; and
(3) Preventative care and screening provided for in
comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health Resources
and Services Administration.
3. To the extent otherwise permissible under federal
or state law, a health carrier or health benefit plan that
uses a network of providers may impose cost-sharing
requirements on the coverage described in subsection 2 of
this section for items or services delivered by an out-of-
network provider.
4. If an insured or enrollee is covered under a high
deductible health plan, as such term is defined in 26 U.S.C.
Section 223 (c)(2), a health carrier or health benefit plan
may apply the deductible requirement of the high deductible
health plan to the coverage required under subsection 2 of
this section, unless the director of the department of
commerce and insurance determines that the coverage is
included in the safe harbor provisions for preventative care
under 26 U.S.C. Section 223 (c)(2)(c).
5. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to prohibit a health carrier or health benefit
plan from providing coverage for services in addition to
those recommended by the U.S. Preventative Services Task
Force or to deny coverage for services that are not
recommended by the Task Force.
6. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall enforce the provisions of this section
consistent with the recommendations and guidelines in effect
on December 31, 2025, set by the U.S. Preventative Services

SB 1705 3
Task Force, the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices
of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or the
Health Resources and Services Administration, and related
federal rules or guidance.
7. The director shall, by rule, adopt regulations to
require health carriers and health benefit plans to provide
coverage without cost-sharing requirement for any
preventative health care services recommendations and
guidelines issued after December 31, 2025, by the U.S.
Preventative Services Task Force, the Advisory Committee on
Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention, or the Health Resources and Services
Administration, and relating federal rules or guidance.
8. (1) The department of commerce and insurance shall
create an advisory committee to be known as the "Health
Insurance Preventative Health Care Services Advisory
Committee". This committee shall be comprised of five
members, with three representatives of health care providers
and two representatives of health carriers and health
benefit plans. All members of the committee shall be
appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the director of
the department. The committee members shall serve without
compensation and shall not be reimbursed for their expenses.
(2) The committee shall meet at least once a year to
make recommendations to the department, the general
assembly, and the governor regarding any updates or
modifications, as necessary, to the preventative health care
services described in subsection 2 of this section. The
committee shall provide any recommendations for updates or
modifications no later than November first each year to the
department, the general assembly, and the governor.

SB 1705 4
9. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓